Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-429
Emergency plan; requirements.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that the administrator of each temporary placement facility described in an emergency plan required under section 43-428 consents to the temporary placement of juveniles placed in such facility pursuant to the emergency plan. Prior to inclusion in an emergency plan as a temporary placement facility, the department and the administrator of the temporary placement facility shall agree on a cost-reimbursement plan for the temporary placement of juveniles at such facility.

(2) If an emergency plan required under section 43-428 is implemented, the Office of Juvenile Services shall, at least twenty-four hours prior to implementation, if practical, and otherwise within twenty-four hours after implementation of such emergency plan, notify the persons and entities listed in subdivision (2)(c) of section 43-428.

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 7.